test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-wwqdwg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ȭʼdõg: # Noun 160 'eng /est õhtu/fin' - full paradigm
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Nom: ȭʼdõg
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Gen: ȭʼdõg
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Par: ȭʼdõgt
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Dat: ȭʼdõgõn
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Ins: ȭʼdõgõks
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Ill: ȭʼdõgõ
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Ela: ȭʼdõgst
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Nom: ȭʼdõgõd
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Gen: ȭʼdõgõd
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Par: ȭʼdõgidi
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Dat: ȭʼdõgõdõn
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Ins: ȭʼdõgõdõks
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Ill: ȭʼdõgiž
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Ela: ȭʼdõgist
